Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1974.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XXIII-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE CCONTINGENCY MANAGEMENT SUPPORT GRANT PROGRAMSection 2321-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ASAM Criteria." The American Society of Addiction Medicine Criteria, 3rd Edition, 2013."Department." The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs of the Commonwealth."Grant." A grant awarded by the department under the program."Grantee." The single county authority that receives a grant from the department."Incentive." A noncash item of nominal value provided to a participant only upon objective verification that a treatment goal under a contingency management plan has been met. The term includes a gift card or voucher that is nontransferable, not convertible to cash and not redeemable for alcohol, tobacco or gambling."Participant." An individual enrolled in outpatient, intensive outpatient, partial hospitalization or narcotic treatment program services who has been clinically assessed as having a stimulant use disorder under the ASAM Criteria."Program." The Contingency Management Support Grant Program established under section 2322-A."Single county authority." The county agency that the department designates as the local drug and alcohol agency.Section 2322-A. Establishment and administration of program.20250HB1974PN2546 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Establishment.--The Contingency Management Support Grant Program is established in the department to support single county authorities in designing, implementing, expanding and evaluating evidence-based contingency management strategies for participants with stimulant use disorder.(b) Administration.--The department shall develop, announce, award and administer grants and provide technical assistance on program design, fidelity and evaluation.(B) ADMINISTRATION.--(1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP, ANNOUNCE, AWARD AND ADMINISTER GRANTS AND PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE ON PROGRAM DESIGN, FIDELITY AND EVALUATION.(2) GUIDANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE STANDARDS FOR THE DESIGN AND IMPLEMENTATION OF CONTINGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM STRUCTURES THAT COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAWS, INCLUDING LAWS RELATING TO FRAUD AND ABUSE.Section 2323-A. Applicants and selection process.(a) Applicants.--A single county authority may apply for a grant individually or in collaboration with one or more providers:(1) licensed to provide drug and alcohol treatment services in this Commonwealth; and(2) located within the county's jurisdiction.(b) Selection.--The department shall publish application procedures and selection criteria on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2324-A. Allowable uses of grants.Grants may be used for any of the following:(1) Planning and implementing, including staff training, drug-testing supplies, secure incentive-tracking systems and 20250HB1974PN2546 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonable administrative costs necessary for program delivery.(2) Noncash incentives for participants, not to exceed $750 per participant in a 12-month period during the contingency management treatment phase. Incentives shall consist only of small-value, noncash items such as gift cards, food vouchers, transit or transportation vouchers or other items the department approves.(3) Technical assistance and fidelity support, including the implementation of incentive-tracking systems and the development of policies and procedures.(4) Program evaluation and reporting.(5) Outreach and engagement, including participant education and referral coordination.Section 2325-A. Prohibited uses of funds.(a) Supplanting.--Grants shall supplement and not supplant existing substance use disorder treatment or other health care services.(b) Other prohibitions.--Grants may not be used for any of the following:(1) Services otherwise reimbursable by Medicaid or a participant's insurer.(2) Cash or cash-equivalent incentives, or any incentive redeemable for alcohol, tobacco or gambling.(3) Incentives used to steer a participant to a particular provider, payer or product.Section 2326-A. Program requirements.An initiative supported by the program shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be delivered in outpatient or similar nonresidential 20250HB1974PN2546 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 settings and provided in conjunction with other evidence- based treatment and recovery support services for substance use disorder, as clinically appropriate . (2) Provide a structured schedule of incentives awarded only upon objective verification of treatment goals, which may include stimulant-negative test results verified by urine testing or another objective test the department approves and documented attendance at counseling or therapy sessions.(3) Provide at least three months of continued treatment and recovery support services after the incentive phase during which no incentives are provided.(4) Ensure a participant is not penalized for declining to participate in a recommended service or for failing to meet a treatment goal.(5) Limit incentives to an aggregate value not exceeding $750 for any participant in a 12-month period during the contingency management treatment phase.(6) Align service delivery conditions with the ASAM Criteria.Section 2327-A. Participant eligibility and consent.A participant shall:(1) receive a clinical assessment and a determination of stimulant use disorder in accordance with the ASAM Criteria;(2) be enrolled in outpatient, intensive outpatient, partial hospitalization or narcotic treatment program services;(3) provide a stimulant-negative urine drug test or another objective test the department approves prior to receiving an incentive; and(4) provide informed consent that explains program 20250HB1974PN2546 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 goals, incentive conditions, privacy protections and grievance procedures.Section 2328-A. Program integrity and privacy.(a) Policies.--A grantee shall adopt written policies to prevent fraud, diversion and duplication of incentives and to prohibit steering or inducement regarding the choice of provider, payer or product.(b) Tracking.--A grantee shall use an auditable system to track incentives and maintain controls over inventory, issuance and reconciliation.(c) Training.--A grantee shall ensure that staff receive initial and periodic training on contingency management principles, ethics and fidelity.(d) Privacy.--A grantee shall obtain and maintain participant consents and protect participant information consistent with Federal and State law, including 42 CFR Pt. 2 (relating to confidentiality of substance use disorder patient records) and 45 CFR Pt. 164 (relating to security and privacy), as applicable.Section 2329-A. Applications.A prospective grantee must submit an application for a grant to the department in a form and manner specified by the department under section 2323-A(b). The application shall include all of the following information:(1) A work plan describing the contingency management model, target population, service setting, staffing and fidelity plan.(2) A budget, including the incentive plan and tracking systems.(3) A monitoring and evaluation plan, including outcome 20250HB1974PN2546 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 metrics, data collection and data-privacy safeguards.Section 2330-A. Reporting and evaluation.(a) Grantee reports.--A grantee shall report outcomes and expenditures to the department in the form and frequency as determined by the department.(b) Department reporting.--The department shall include the following information in the annual report required under section 2301-A(7)(i), which may not include personally identifiable information of participants:(1) Grants awarded and geographic distribution.(2) The number of participants served.(3) A review of information reported by single county authorities, including outcomes, participant engagement, retention and continuing care.(4) Findings and recommendations for program improvement.(c) Evaluation criteria.--The department shall establish evaluation criteria, including outcomes related to stimulant abstinence, treatment retention and program fidelity.Section 2331-A. Funding.Subject to the availability of Federal funds, Federal State Opioid Response grant funds appropriated by the General Assembly shall be the primary source of funding for the purposes of this subarticle. The following shall apply:(1) If Federal funds are insufficient or unavailable, the department may use other money appropriated by the General Assembly.(2) The department may use a portion of any money allocated for the program for Statewide technical assistance, fidelity support and evaluation.20250HB1974PN2546 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2332-A. Guidelines and regulations.The department shall issue guidelines and may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this subarticle.Section 2333-A. Construction.Nothing in this subarticle shall be construed to require participation by a provider or a participant or to alter a requirement under Federal or State law governing confidentiality, professional licensure or payer coverage.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1974PN2546 - 8 - 123456789